Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.455

Nonapplicability of RCW 32.32.440 and 32.32.445.

RCW 32.32.440 and 32.32.445 shall not apply to a transfer, agreement or understanding to transfer, offer, or announcement of an offer or intent to make an offer which (1) pertains only to securities to be purchased pursuant to RCW 32.32.060, 32.32.150, or 32.32.175; and (2) has prior written approval of the director.

[ 1994 c 92 s 397; 1981 c 85 s 90.]